en: Watercress (fresh)
fr: Cresson frais
nl: Waterkers (vers)

en: Frozen leaf vegetables
fr: Légumes-feuilles surgelés, Légume-feuille surgelé

en: Fresh vegetables sprouts
es: Germinados de verduras y hortalizas frescos, Brotes de verduras y hortalizas frescos
fr: Germes de légumes frais, Pousses de légumes frais
hr: Klice svježeg povrća
nl: Kiemgroentes

en: Fresh onion sprouts
es: Germinados de cebolla frescos, Brotes de cebolla frescos
fr: Germes d'oignons frais, Pousses d'oignons frais
hr: Klice svježeg luka
nl: Verse uikiemen

en: Fresh leek sprouts
es: Germinados de puerros frescos
fr: Germes de poireaux frais, pousses de poireaux fraîches
hr: Svježe klice poriluka

en: Fresh cabbage sprouts
es: Germinados de col frescos
fr: Germes de choux frais
hr: Klice svježeg kupusa

en: Dried vegetables
bg: Сушени зеленчуци
da: Tørrede grønsager
de: Getrocknetes Gemüse
el: Αποξηραμένα λαχανικά
eo: Sekigitaj legomoj
es: Verduras y hortalizas deshidratadas, Verduras y hortalizas desecadas, Verduras deshidratadas, Verduras desecadas, Hortalizas deshidratadas, Hortalizas desecadas
fi: Kuivatut vihannekset
fr: Légumes séchés
hr: Sušeno povrće
it: Ortaggi essiccati, Verdura essiccata
ja: 乾燥野菜
ko: 건채
lv: Kaltēti dārzeņi
nl: Gedroogde groenten
pl: Warzywa suszone
ru: Сушёный овощ
sl: Suha zelenjava
sv: Torkade grönsaker
uk: Сушені овочі

en: Dried tomatoes, Sun-dried tomatoes, Dried tomato, Sun-dried tomato
bg: Сушени домати
da: soltørrede tomater
de: Getrocknete Tomaten
es: Tomates secos, Tomates deshidratados, Tomates desecados
fi: kuivatut tomaatit
fr: Tomates séchées, Tomate séchée
hr: Sušene rajčice
it: Pomodori essiccati
ja: 干しトマト, ドライトマト
nl: Gedroogde tomaten
pl: Pomidory suszone
sv: soltorkade tomater

en: Natural dried tomatoes
es: Tomates secos al natural, Tomates deshidratados al natural
fr: Tomates séchées naturelles
hr: Prirodne sušene rajčice
nl: Natuurlijk gedroogde tomaten
pl: Naturalne pomidory suszone

en: Dried tomato in oil, Dried tomatoes in oil, Sun-dried tomato in oil, Sun-dried tomatoes in oil, Rehydrated dried tomatoes in oil
bg: Сушени домати в олио
da: Soltørrede tomater i olie
de: getrocknete Tomaten in Öl
es: Tomates secos en aceite, Tomates secos rehidratados en aceite
fi: kuivattuja tomaatteja öljyssä
fr: Tomates séchées à l'huile, Tomate séchée à l'huile, Tomates séchées réhydratées à l'huile
hr: Sušene rajčice u ulju
it: Pomodoro essiccato sott'olio
nl: Gedroogde tomaten op olie
pl: Pomidory suszone w oleju
sv: Soltorkade tomater i olja

en: Ground dried vegetables
de: Gemahlenes Trockengemüse
es: Verduras y hortalizas deshidratadas molidas, Verduras y hortalizas deshidratadas en polvo
fi: jauhetut kuivatut vihannekset
fr: Légumes séchés moulus
hr: Mljeveno sušeno povrće
it: Ortaggi essiccati e macinati
nl: Gemalen gedroogde groenten
sv: Malna torkade grönsaker

en: Tomato powders, Dried tomato powder, Tomato powder, Ground dried tomato
da: Tomatpulvere
es: Tomate seco molido, Tomates en polvo
fr: Poudre de tomate séchée
hr: Sušene rajčice u prahu
nl: Tomatenpoeders
pl: Pomidory suszone w proszku, Proszek z suszonych pomidorów
sv: Tomatpulver

en: Garlic powders, Garlic powder, Granulated garlic, Dried garlic powder
ar: مسحوق الثوم
bg: Чесън на прах
cs: Sušený česnek
da: Hvidløgspulvere
de: Knoblauchpulver, Knoblauch granuliert
es: Ajos secos en polvo, Ajo seco molido
fa: پودر سیر
fi: Valkosipulijauhe
fr: Ail sec broyé, Ail séché en poudre, Poudre d'ail
ha: Tafarnuwa foda
hr: Češnjak u prahu
hu: Fokhagyma por, Foghagyma granulátum
it: Polvere di aglio
ja: ガーリックパウダー, ニンニク粉末
jv: Bawang bubuk
ko: 마늘가루
nl: Knoflookpoeders
pl: Czosnek granulowany, Czosnek w proszku
ru: Чесночный порошок
sr: Лук у праху
sv: Vitlökspulver
tr: Sarımsak tozu
zh: 蒜粉

en: Onion powders, Onion powder, Granulated onion, Dried minced onion
bg: Лук на прах
da: Løgpulvere
de: Zwiebelpulver
el: κρεμμύδια σε σκόνη, κρεμμύδι σκόνη
eo: pulvorigita cepo
es: Cebolla seca molida, Cebollas secas en polvo, cebolla en polvo
fi: sipulijauhe
fr: oignon en poudre, oignons en poudre, poudre d'oignons, poudre d'oignon
hr: Luk u prahu
hu: vöröshagymapor
it: cipolla en polvere
ja: オニオンパウダー
ms: Serbuk bawang
nl: uienpoeder, uipoeder, Uienpoeders
pl: Cebula granulowana, Cebula w proszku
pt: cebola em pó
sk: sušená cibuľa
sl: čebula v prahu
sv: Lökpulver

en: Freeze-dried vegetables, Lyophilized vegetables
da: Frysetørrede grøntsager
de: Gefriergetrocknetes Gemüse
es: Verduras y hortalizas liofilizadas
fr: Légumes lyophilisées
hr: Liofilizirano povrće
nl: Vriesgedroogde groenten
sv: Frystorkade grönsaker

en: Legumes and their products
bg: Зеленчуци и зеленчукови продукти
ca: Llegums i derivats
da: Bælgplanter og -produkter
de: Hülsenfrüchte und Hülsenfruchtprodukte
es: Leguminosas y derivados, Legumbres y derivados, Legumbres y sus productos
fi: Juurekset ja juurestuotteet
fr: Légumineuses et dérivés
he: קטניות ומוצריהן
hr: Mahunarke i njihovi proizvodi
hu: Hüvelyesek és azok termékei
it: Legumi ed i loro prodotti
lt: Ankštiniai produktai ir jų gaminiai
nl: Bonen- en afgeleide producten
pl: Strączkowe i produkty strączkowe
pt: Legumes e seus produtos
ru: Продукты из бобовых растений
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์จากถั่วเมล็ดแห้ง
tr: Bakliyat ve bakliyat ürünleri, Baklagiller ve baklagiller ürünleri
zh: 豆类及其制品

en: Legumes
bg: Зеленчуци
ca: Llegums
cs: Luštěniny
da: Bælgfrugter
de: Hülsenfrüchte
es: Leguminosas, Legumbres
fi: palkokasvit
fr: Légumineuses
he: קטניות
hr: Leguminoze
hu: Hüvelyesek
it: Verdure
ja: マメ科, まめか
la: Fabaceae, Leguminosae
lt: Ankštiniai produktai
nl: Bonen
pl: Strączkowe
pt: Legumes
ru: Бобовые
sv: Ärtväxter, Baljväxter, Legymer
th: ถั่วเมล็ดแห้ง
tr: Bakliyat, Baklagiller
zh: 豆类

en: Fresh legumes
de: Frische Hülsenfrüchte
es: Leguminosas frescas, Legumbres frescas
fi: tuoreet palkokasvit
fr: Légumineuses frais
hr: Svježe mahunarke
nl: Verse bonen

en: Mix of cereals and legumes
fr: Mélange de céréales et légumineuses

en: Flat beans
fr: Haricots plats